Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2502
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to assist in securing early intervention services to infants or toddlers with disabilities and their families in accordance with the federal early intervention program and whenever possible in concert with the family policy objectives prescribed in sections 43-532 and 43-533 and federal and state initiatives. Such services are necessary to:

(1) Enhance the development of infants and toddlers with disabilities;

(2) Reduce the costs to our society by minimizing the need for special services, including special education and related services, after such infants or toddlers reach school age;

(3) Minimize the likelihood of institutionalization of persons with disabilities and maximize their potential for independent living in society;

(4) Enhance the capacity of families to meet the needs of their infants or toddlers with disabilities;

(5) Strengthen, promote, and empower families to determine the most appropriate use of resources to address the unique and changing needs of families and their infants or toddlers with disabilities; and

(6) Enhance the capacity of state and local agencies and service providers to identify, evaluate, and meet the needs of historically underrepresented populations, particularly minority, low-income, and rural populations.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB746, § 22.